Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-504
Copies in possession of county officers; delivery to successors; section, termination.

Each county officer shall deliver to such officer's successor in office all laws and journals which shall have come into such officer's possession under the provisions of sections 49-502 and 49-503 as soon after such officer's successor shall have qualified as such successor or as the county clerk may require.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 4, p. 290;

R.S.1913, § 3736;

C.S.1922, § 3129;

C.S.1929, § 49-504;

R.S.1943, § 49-504;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 6.
July 18, 2026